Washington statutes.
RCW 43.348.080

Andy Hill cancer research endowment fund match transfer account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5455.SL) ***

(1) The Andy Hill cancer research endowment fund match transfer account is created in the custody of the state treasury to be used solely and exclusively for the program created in RCW 43.348.040. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. The purpose of the account is to provide matching funds for the fund and administrative costs. Expenditures to fund or reimburse the program administrator are not subject to the requirements of subsection (4) of this section.

(2) The legislature must appropriate a state match, up to a maximum of ten million dollars annually, beginning July 1, 2016, and each July 1st following the end of the fiscal year from tax collections and penalties generated from enforcement of state taxes on cigarettes and other tobacco products by the state liquor and cannabis board or other federal, state or local law or tax enforcement agency, as determined by the department of revenue. Tax collections include any cigarette tax, other tobacco product tax, and retail sales and use tax. Any amounts deposited into this account from the tax imposed under RCW 82.25.010 in excess of the cap provided in this subsection must be deposited into the foundational public health services account created in RCW 82.25.015.

(3) Revenues to the account must consist of deposits into the account, taxes imposed on vapor products under RCW 82.25.010, legislative appropriations, and any gifts, grants, or donations received by the department for this purpose.

(4) Each fiscal biennium, the legislature must appropriate to the department of commerce such amounts as estimated to be the balance of the account to provide state matching funds.

(5) Expenditures, in the form of matching funds, from the account may be made only upon receipt of proof from the program administrator of nonstate or private contributions to the fund for the program. Expenditures, in the form of matching funds, may not exceed the total amount of nonstate or private contributions.

(6) The department must enter into an appropriate agreement with the program administrator to demonstrate exchange of consideration for the matching funds.

(7) Moneys expended into the account in fiscal year 2023 pursuant to section 706, chapter 297, Laws of 2022 are not subject to the requirements of subsections (5) and (6) of this section.

[ 2022 c 297 s 961; 2019 c 445 s 403; 2018 c 4 s 8; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 34 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 297: See note following RCW 43.79.565.

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2019 c 445: See RCW 82.25.900 and 82.25.901.

Automatic expiration date and tax preference performance statement exemption—2019 c 445: See note following RCW 82.08.0318.